Maryland, session 2026, HB0252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
6–1001.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Abatement” means a set of measures that eliminate or reduce lead–based
paint hazards in residential, public, or commercial buildings, bridges, or other structures
or superstructures in accordance with standards established by the Department which may
include:
(1) The removal of lead–based paint and lead–contaminated dust, the
containment or encapsulation of lead–based paint, the replacement or demolition of
lead–painted surfaces or fixtures, and the removal or covering of lead–contaminated soil;
(2) All preparation, cleanup, disposal, and postabatement clearance testing
activities associated with these measures; and
– 1 –

Ch. 359 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) The renovation, repair, and painting of a lead–containing substance in
a residential, public, or commercial building built before 1978.
(c) “Lead containing substance” means:
(1) Any paint, plaster, or surface encapsulation material containing more
than 0.50 percent lead by weight calculated as lead metal in the dried solid or more than
0.7 milligrams lead per square centimeter as measured by an X–ray fluorescence analyzer;
or
(2) Such other standards consistent with an applicable federal definition
as the Department may set by regulation.
(d) “Person” includes any public or municipal corporation, or any agency, bureau,
department, or instrumentality of federal, State, or local government.
(e) “Provide lead paint abatement services” means to engage in the risk
assessment, inspection, or abatement of lead–containing substances.
6–1002.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, unless the person is
accredited by the Department under this subtitle, a person may not:
(1) Act as a contractor or supervisor for the purpose of providing lead paint
abatement services;
(2) Provide training to others who provide lead paint abatement services;
or
(3) Engage in the inspection of lead–based paint hazards.
(b) The Department shall, by regulation, create exceptions to the accreditation
requirement for instances where the disturbance of lead–containing substance is
incidental.
(c) An individual who acts only as a worker or project designer need not be
accredited, but must be trained.
6–1003.
(a) The Department shall adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of this
subtitle.
(b) Regulations adopted under this subtitle may include:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 359
(1) Initial and continuing standards and procedures for accreditation,
including education, training, examination, and job performance standards;
(2) Standards and procedures for renewal of accreditation;
(3) Standards and procedures for modification, suspension, or revocation of
accreditation;
(4) Different standards and procedures for different lead paint abatement
services;
(5) Standards and procedures for abatement involving the renovation,
repair, and painting of lead–containing substances, including a requirement for lead–dust
testing;
(6) Recognition of accreditation or similar approvals of persons by other
governmental entities; [and]
(7) REQUIREMENTS FOR ANY PERSON WHO IS ACCREDITED BY THE
DEPARTMENT TO PROVIDE LEAD PAINT ABATEMENT SERVICES TO BE COVERED BY
A REASONABLE PERFORMANCE BOND OR REASONABLE LIABILITY INSURANCE; AND
(8) Such other provisions as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of
this subtitle.
(c) The Department shall review and revise its certification and other regulations
under this subtitle as necessary to ensure continued eligibility for federal funding of
lead–hazard activities in the State.
(d) The Department shall set reasonable fees for the accreditation of persons who
provide lead paint abatement services sufficient to cover the Department’s direct and
indirect costs of administering this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 3 –